Louisiana, session 2026, HB362.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9091.30 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9091.30. Regency Park Townhomes Crime Prevention and Security District
A. There is hereby created within the parish of Orleans, as more specifically
provided in Subsection B of this Section, a body politic and corporate known as the
Regency Park Townhomes Crime Prevention and Security District, referred to in this
Section as the "district". The district is a political subdivision of the state as defined
in the Constitution of Louisiana.
B. The district is comprised of the area within the following perimeter:
Morrison Road, Downman Road, Seabrook Place, and Countess Lane.
C. The district is established for the primary objective and purpose of
promoting and encouraging the beautification, security, and overall betterment of the
district.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 362 ENROLLED
D.(1) The district shall be governed by a board of commissioners, referred
to in this Section as the "board", composed of five voting members and one
nonvoting member as follows:
(a) The president, secretary, and treasurer of the Regency Park Townhomes
Association, referred to in this Section as the "association".
(b) The governing board of the association shall appoint two members who
shall be residents of the district.
(c) The manager of the Regency Park Townhomes who shall be a nonvoting
member.
(2)(a) Board members serving pursuant to Subparagraph (1)(b) of this
Subsection shall serve three-year terms after initial terms as follows: one member
shall serve an initial term of three years and one shall serve an initial term of two
years, as determined by lot at the first meeting of the board.
(b) The members serving pursuant to Subparagraphs (1)(a) and (c) of this
Subsection shall serve during their terms of office.
(3) Any vacancy which occurs prior to the expiration of a term shall be filled
for the remainder of the unexpired term in the manner of the original appointment.
(4) The board shall elect from its members a chairman, a vice chairman, a
secretary, a treasurer, and other officers as it deems necessary. The duties of the
officers shall be fixed by the bylaws adopted by the board.
(5) The secretary or the treasurer of the board shall maintain the minute
books and archives of the district. The monies, funds, and accounts of the district
shall be in the official custody of the board.
(6) The board may adopt rules and regulations for conducting its business
affairs. Rules and regulations of the board relative to the notice and conduct of
meetings shall conform to applicable law, including laws relative to open meetings.
The board shall hold regular meetings and may hold special meetings at times and
places within the district as prescribed in the bylaws.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 362 ENROLLED
(7) A majority of the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum for
the transaction of business. The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and shall
make them available through the secretary of the board to residents of the district.
(8) The members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be
reimbursed for reasonable out-of-pocket expenses directly related to the governance
of the district.
E. The district, acting through its board, shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) To sue and be sued.
(2) To adopt, use, and alter at will a corporate seal.
(3) To receive and expend funds collected pursuant to Subsections F and G
of this Section and in accordance with a budget adopted as provided by Subsection
H of this Section.
(4) To enter into contracts with individuals or entities, private or public.
(5) To provide or enhance security patrols in the district and to provide for
improved lighting, signage, or matters relating to the security and beautification of
the district.
(6) To enter into contracts and agreements with one or more other districts
for the joint security, improvement, or betterment of all participating districts.
(7) To provide for services and make expenditures as the board deems proper
for the upkeep and beautification of the district.
(8) To acquire or lease items and supplies that the board deems instrumental
to achieving the purposes of the district.
(9) To procure and maintain liability insurance against any personal or legal
liability of a board member that may be asserted or incurred based upon his service
as a member of the board or that may arise as a result of his actions taken within the
scope and discharge of his duties as a member of the board.
(10) To perform or have performed any other function or activity necessary
or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the district or for the overall betterment
of the district.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 362 ENROLLED
F.(1)(a) The governing authority of the city of New Orleans may impose and
collect a parcel fee within the district subject to and in accordance with the
provisions of this Subsection.
(b) The amount of the fee shall be as requested by duly adopted resolution
of the board. The fee shall be a flat fee per parcel of land not to exceed three
hundred dollars per year for each parcel.
(c) For purposes of this Section, "parcel" means a lot, a subdivided portion
of ground, an individual tract, or a "condominium parcel" as defined in R.S.
9:1121.103.
(d) The owner of each parcel is responsible for payment of the fee.
(2)(a) The fee shall be imposed only after the question of its imposition has
been approved by a majority of the registered voters of the district who vote on the
proposition at an election held for that purpose in accordance with the Louisiana
Election Code. The amount of the fee may be changed by duly adopted resolution
of the board, not to exceed the maximum amount authorized in this Subsection. No
other election shall be required except as provided by this Paragraph.
(b) The fee shall expire at the time provided in the proposition, not to exceed
five years, but the fee may be renewed if approved by a majority of the registered
voters of the district voting on the proposition at an election as provided in
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph. Any election to authorize the renewal of the fee
shall be held for that purpose in accordance with the Louisiana Election Code. If the
fee is renewed, the term of the imposition of the fee shall be as provided in the
proposition authorizing such renewal, not to exceed five years.
(3) The fee shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as ad
valorem taxes are collected.
(4) Any parcel fee which is unpaid shall be added to the tax rolls of the city
and shall be enforced with the same authority and subject to the same penalties and
procedures as unpaid ad valorem taxes.
(5)(a) The city of New Orleans shall remit to the district all amounts
collected not more than sixty days after collection.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 362 ENROLLED
(b) The district shall use the proceeds of the fee solely and exclusively for
the purpose and benefit of the district; however, the city may retain one percent of
the amount collected as a collection fee.
G. The district may solicit and accept additional voluntary contributions and
grants to further the purposes of the district.
H.(1) The board of commissioners shall adopt an annual budget in
accordance with the Louisiana Local Government Budget Act, R.S. 39:1301 et seq.
(2) The district shall be subject to audit by the legislative auditor pursuant
to R.S. 24:513.
I.(1) It is the purpose and intent of this Section that any additional security
patrols, public or private, or any other security or other services or betterments
provided by the district shall be supplemental to and not be in lieu of personnel and
services to be provided in the district by the state or the city of New Orleans or their
departments or agencies or by other political subdivisions.
(2) If the district ceases to exist, the board shall transmit all district funds to
the city of New Orleans, and such funds, together with any other funds collected by
the city of New Orleans pursuant to this Section, shall be maintained in a separate
account by the city and shall be used only to promote, encourage, and enhance the
security of the area included in the district.
J.(1) The district shall indemnify its officers and board members to the
fullest extent permitted by R.S. 12:227, as fully as if the district were a nonprofit
corporation governed thereby, and as may be provided in the district's bylaws.
(2) No board member or officer of the district shall be liable to the district
or to any individual who resides, owns property, visits, or otherwise conducts
business in the district for monetary damages for breach of his duties as a board
member or officer, provided that the foregoing provision shall not eliminate or limit
the liability of a board member or officer for any of the following:
(a) Acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional
misconduct or a knowing violation of law.
(b) Any transaction from which he derived an improper personal benefit.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 362 ENROLLED
(3) To the fullest extent permitted by R.S. 9:2792 et seq., including R.S.
9:2792.1 through 2792.9, a person serving the district as a board member or officer
shall not be individually liable for any act or omission arising out of the performance
of his duties.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.